testing/kom-num-test.yaml
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясас
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясланьыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: нёльӧдъяссяньыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдтіыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxSg3: нёльӧдъясӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: нёльӧдъясным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: нёльӧдъяснымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abl: нёльӧдъяснымлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: нёльӧдъяснымлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: нёльӧдъяснымӧс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl1: нёльӧдъяснаным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: нёльӧдъяснымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl1: нёльӧдъястӧгным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cns: нёльӧдъяснымла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl1: нёльӧдъяссяным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясаным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl1: нёльӧдъяссьыным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясаным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясланьным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl1: нёльӧдъяссяньным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясӧдным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясӧдтіным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl1: нёльӧдъясӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: нёльӧдъясныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: нёльӧдъясныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abl: нёльӧдъясныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: нёльӧдъясныдлы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: нёльӧдъясныдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl2: нёльӧдъяснаныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: нёльӧдъясныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl2: нёльӧдъястӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cns: нёльӧдъясныдла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl2: нёльӧдъяссяныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl2: нёльӧдъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl2: нёльӧдъяссьыныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl2: нёльӧдъясаныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl2+Apr: нёльӧдъясныдлань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl2: нёльӧдъяссяньныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl2: нёльӧдъясӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльӧдъясӧдтіныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl2: нёльӧдъясӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: нёльӧдъясныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: нёльӧдъясныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abl: нёльӧдъясныслысь
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: нёльӧдъясныслы
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: нёльӧдъяснысӧ
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxPl3: нёльӧдъяснаныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: нёльӧдъясныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car+PxPl3: нёльӧдъястӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cns: нёльӧдъяснысла
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp+PxPl3: нёльӧдъяссяныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela+PxPl3: нёльӧдъяссьыныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясаныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxPl3+Apr: нёльӧдъясныслань
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясланьныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr+PxPl3: нёльӧдъяссяньныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясӧдтіныс
     нёль+Num+Ord+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter+PxPl3: нёльӧдъясӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Abs: нёльнан
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Nom: нёльнан
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Acc: [нёльнан, нёльнанӧс]
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Gen: нёльнанлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Abl: нёльнанлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Dat: нёльнанлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr: нёльнанӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Com: нёльнанкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car: нёльнантӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Cns: нёльнанла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp: нёльнанся
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine: нёльнанын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela: нёльнанысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill: нёльнанӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr: нёльнанлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr: нёльнансянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl: нёльнанӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra: нёльнанӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter: нёльнанӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: нёльнанӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: нёльнанӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abl: нёльнанӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: нёльнанӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: нёльнанӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнаннам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: нёльнанӧйкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Car: нёльнанӧйтӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cns: нёльнанӧйла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Comp: нёльнанӧйся
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: нёльнансьым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: нёльнанам
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Apr: нёльнанӧйлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg1+Egr: нёльнанӧйсянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдтіым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg1: нёльнанӧдзым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: нёльнаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: нёльнаныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abl: нёльнаныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: нёльнаныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: нёльнантӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg2: нёльнаннад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: нёльнаныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: нёльнантӧгыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cns: нёльнаныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg2: нёльнансяыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: нёльнансьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: нёльнанад
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: нёльнанланьыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: нёльнансяньыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдтіыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg2: нёльнанӧдзыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: нёльнаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: нёльнаныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abl: нёльнаныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: нёльнаныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: нёльнансӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxSg3: нёльнаннас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: нёльнаныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: нёльнантӧгыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cns: нёльнанысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxSg3: нёльнансяыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: нёльнансьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: нёльнанас
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: нёльнанланьыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: нёльнансяньыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдтіыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxSg3: нёльнанӧдзыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: нёльнанным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: нёльнаннымлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abl: нёльнаннымлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: нёльнаннымлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: нёльнаннымӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl1: нёльнаннаным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: нёльнаннымкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: нёльнантӧгным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cns: нёльнаннымла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl1: нёльнансяным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: нёльнансьыным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: нёльнананым
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: нёльнанланьным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: нёльнансяньным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдтіным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl1: нёльнанӧдзным
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: нёльнанныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: нёльнанныдлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abl: нёльнанныдлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: нёльнанныдлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: нёльнанныдтӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl2: нёльнаннаныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: нёльнанныдкӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: нёльнантӧгныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cns: нёльнанныдла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl2: нёльнансяныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: нёльнансьыныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: нёльнананыд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl2+Apr: нёльнанныдлань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: нёльнансяньныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдтіныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl2: нёльнанӧдзныд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: нёльнанныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: нёльнанныслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abl: нёльнанныслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: нёльнанныслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: нёльнаннысӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Instr+PxPl3: нёльнаннаныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: нёльнанныскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: нёльнантӧгныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cns: нёльнаннысла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Comp+PxPl3: нёльнансяныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: нёльнансьыныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: нёльнананыс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+PxPl3+Apr: нёльнанныслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: нёльнанланьныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: нёльнансяньныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Prl+Tra+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдтіныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Sg+Ter+PxPl3: нёльнанӧдзныс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Nom: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльнанъяс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Acc: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Gen: нёльнанъяслӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Abl: нёльнанъяслысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Dat: нёльнанъяслы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr: нёльнанъясӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Com: нёльнанъяскӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Car: нёльнанъястӧг
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Cns: нёльнанъясла
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Comp: нёльнанъясся
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ine: нёльнанъясын
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ela: нёльнанъясысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ill: нёльнанъясӧ
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Apr: нёльнанъяслань
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Egr: нёльнанъяссянь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl: нёльнанъясӧд
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Prl+Tra: нёльнанъясӧдті
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Ter: нёльнанъясӧдз
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: нёльнанъясӧй
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: нёльнанъясӧйлӧн
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abl: нёльнанъясӧйлысь
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: нёльнанъясӧйлы
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: нёльнанъясӧс
     нёль+Num+Coll+Der/MWN+N+Pl+Instr+PxSg1: нёльнанъяснам
